District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
Act may be cited as the “Society for Science Real Property Tax Exemption Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 10 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“Sec. 47-1099.13. Society for Science; Lots 0062 and 0802, Square 0158, and Lot 0031,
Square 0404.”
(b) A new section 47-1099.13 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1099.13
(a) The real properties, and any improvements on the properties, located at 1719 N St.,
N.W., in Lot 0062, Square 0158, 1723 N St., N.W., Lot 0802, Square 0158, and 800 8th St.,
N.W., Lot 0031, Square 0404 owned by or being sold to the Society for Science Inc. shall be


exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title, so long as the Property is owned and used
by Society of Science Inc.
(b) The tax exemption provided pursuant to this paragraph shall be in addition to, and not
lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to Society for Science
Inc.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.